Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1707.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 151.4 of Title 74, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


The Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation shall be prohibited


from administering any ballistic testing on a firearm for which


there is no reasonable suspicion that the firearm was used during


the commission of a crime.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3190 CN 1/14/2026 10:44:43 AM







Req. No. 3190 Page 1